Illinois, session 104th, HB5047.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act is 5amended by changing Section 100 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 9/100)7    Sec. 100. Notice of closure. An owner of an establishment 8licensed under this Act shall give 90 days notice prior to 9voluntarily closing the establishment or prior to closing any 10part of the establishment if closing the part will require 11residency termination. The notice shall be given to the 12Department, to the Office of the State Long Term Care 13Ombudsman, to any resident who must have their residency 14terminated, the resident's representative, and to a member of 15the resident's family, where practicable. The notice shall 16state the proposed date of closing and the reason for closing. 17The establishment shall offer to assist the resident in 18securing an alternative placement and shall advise the 19resident on available alternatives. Where the resident is 20unable to choose an alternative placement and is not under 21guardianship, the Department shall be notified of the need for 22relocation assistance. The establishment shall comply with all 23applicable laws and rules until the date of closing, including   HB5047 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18848 BAB 32293 b1those related to residency termination.2(Source: P.A. 91-656, eff. 1-1-01.) 3    Section 10. The MC/DD Act is amended by changing Section 43-423 as follows: 5    (210 ILCS 46/3-423)6    Sec. 3-423. Closure of facility; notice. Any owner of a 7facility licensed under this Act shall give 90 days' notice 8prior to voluntarily closing a facility or closing any part of 9a facility, or prior to closing any part of a facility if 10closing such part will require the transfer or discharge of 11more than 10% of the residents. Such notice shall be given to 12the Department, to the Office of the State Long Term Care 13Ombudsman, to any resident who must be transferred or 14discharged, to the resident's representative, and to a member 15of the resident's family, where practicable. Notice shall 16state the proposed date of closing and the reason for closing. 17The facility shall offer to assist the resident in securing an 18alternative placement and shall advise the resident on 19available alternatives. Where the resident is unable to choose 20an alternate placement and is not under guardianship, the 21Department shall be notified of the need for relocation 22assistance. The facility shall comply with all applicable laws 23and regulations until the date of closing, including those 24related to transfer or discharge of residents. The Department   HB5047 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18848 BAB 32293 b1may place a relocation team in the facility as provided under 2Section 3-419. 3(Source: P.A. 99-180, eff. 7-29-15.) 4    Section 15. The ID/DD Community Care Act is amended by 5changing Section 3-423 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 47/3-423)7    Sec. 3-423. Closure of facility; notice. Any owner of a 8facility licensed under this Act shall give 90 days' notice 9prior to voluntarily closing a facility or closing any part of 10a facility, or prior to closing any part of a facility if 11closing such part will require the transfer or discharge of 12more than 10% of the residents. Such notice shall be given to 13the Department, to the Office of the State Long Term Care 14Ombudsman, to any resident who must be transferred or 15discharged, to the resident's representative, and to a member 16of the resident's family, where practicable. Notice shall 17state the proposed date of closing and the reason for closing. 18The facility shall offer to assist the resident in securing an 19alternative placement and shall advise the resident on 20available alternatives. Where the resident is unable to choose 21an alternate placement and is not under guardianship, the 22Department shall be notified of the need for relocation 23assistance. The facility shall comply with all applicable laws 24and regulations until the date of closing, including those   HB5047 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18848 BAB 32293 b1related to transfer or discharge of residents. The Department 2may place a relocation team in the facility as provided under 3Section 3-419. 4(Source: P.A. 96-339, eff. 7-1-10.)